src/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc
!! Adposition inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nenets adpositions inflect in person (and some in local cases).

LEXICON POSTP_ABS
+Po+Abs: K ;
POSTP_VOW ;

LEXICON POSTP_VOW
+Po: AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: н ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: ниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: ндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: ндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: наˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: даˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: ндоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_DAT
+Po+Dat:ʼ K ;
:а POSTP_VOW ;

LEXICON POSTP_LOC
+Po+Loc:на K ;
+Po+Loc:на AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;

!+Po+PxSg1: нан ;
!+Po+PxSg1: нани ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нанд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нанда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: наниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: нандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: нандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: нанаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: нандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: нандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var
+Po+Loc:ня K ;
+Po+Loc:ня AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: нян ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нянд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нянда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: няниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: няндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: няндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: нянаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: няндаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: няндоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_ABL
+Po+Abl:д K ;
+Po+Abl:да AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: дан ;
!+Po+PxSg2: данд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: данда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: даниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: дандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: дандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: данаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: дандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: дандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_PROS
+Po+Pros:мна K ;
+Po+Pros:мна AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: мнан ;
!+Po+PxSg2: мнанд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: мнанда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: мнаниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: мнандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: мнандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: мнанаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: мнандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: мнандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var
+Po+Pros:мня K ;
+Po+Pros:мня AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;

!+Po+PxSg1: мнян ;
!+Po+PxSg2: мнянд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: мнянда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: мняниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: мняндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: мняндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: мнянаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: мняндаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: мняндоʼ ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
